Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-1949
Rules and regulations; contested
cases; procedure.

(1)
To protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public and to insure to
the greatest extent possible the efficient, adequate, and safe care of children,
the department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations consistent with
the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act as necessary
for:

(a) The proper
care and protection of children in residential child-caring agencies and child-placing
agencies regulated under the act;

(b) The issuance, discipline, and reinstatement
of licenses; and

(c) The proper administration of the act.

(2) Such rules and regulations
shall establish standards for levels of care and services which may include,
but are not limited to, supervision and structured activities designed to
address the social, emotional, educational, rehabilitative, medical, and physical
needs of children residing in or being placed by a residential child-caring
agency or child-placing agency and may include the use of community resources
to meet the needs of children and qualifications of staff.

(3) Contested
cases of the department under the act shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 26.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.